Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB470.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 222.233 is amended to read as follows:
The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to:
(1) Require that:
(a) Until January 1, 2027, licensed alcohol and other drug treatment entities, behavioral health service
organizations, behavioral health multi-specialty groups, and any entities that bill for peer support
services that employ an alcohol and drug peer support specialist, only employ an alcohol and drug
peer support specialist who is either registered under KRS 309.0831 or meets the requirements of
applicable administrative regulations in effect on or after July 15, 2024; and[Until January 1, 2026,
require that licensed alcohol and other drug treatment entities and behavioral health service
organizations only employ a temporary alcohol and drug peer support specialist or alcohol and drug
peer support specialist who is registered under KRS Chapter 309 or a temporary alcohol and drug peer
support specialist or alcohol and drug peer support specialist who meets the requirements of applicable
administrative regulations in effect on July 15, 2024, or any applicable administrative regulations
promulgated thereafter.]
(b) Beginning January 1, 2027[2026], [require that ]licensed alcohol and other drug treatment entities,[
and] behavioral health service organizations, behavioral health multi-specialty groups, and any
entities that bill for peer support services that[ only] employ an[a temporary alcohol and drug peer
support specialist or] alcohol and drug peer support specialist only employ an alcohol and drug peer
support specialist who is registered under KRS 309.0831[Chapter 309];
(2) [Permit a registered temporary alcohol and drug peer support specialist to provide the same services and be
reimbursed at the same rates as a registered alcohol and drug peer support specialist;
(3) Remove any limits on the maximum number of hours of direct client care that may be provided by a registered
alcohol and drug peer support specialist;
(4) ]Require that a [temporary certified alcohol and drug counselor under the clinical supervision of a certified
alcohol and drug counselor, a ]licensed alcohol and drug counselor[,] or a licensed clinical alcohol or drug
counselor be a reimbursable service provider in alcohol and other drug treatment entities and behavioral health
service organizations;[
(5) Permit a licensed alcohol and drug counselor to provide the same services and be reimbursed at the same rates
as a licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor in licensed alcohol and other drug treatment entities and
behavioral health service organizations;]
(3)[(6)] Permit the qualifications for a case manager for an individual with mental or substance use disorder to
be a bachelor's degree or higher in any field of study and set forth training and supervision requirements to
substitute for required work experience;
(4)[(7)] Require that a community support associate approved by the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities to be a reimbursable service provider in licensed alcohol and other
drug treatment entities and behavioral health service organizations; and
(5)[(8)] Permit peer support specialists to provide services to groups of the same size as other licensed clinical
professionals in a licensed alcohol and other drug treatment entities and behavioral health service
organizations; and
(6) Prohibit alcohol and drug peer support specialists employed by behavioral health service organizations,
behavioral health multi-specialty groups, or entities that bill for peer support services from providing
psychoeducational services in individual or group settings.
Section 2. KRS 309.0805 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) No person shall use the title "certified clinical supervisor," "licensed alcohol and drug counselor," "licensed
clinical alcohol and drug counselor," "licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor associate," "certified
alcohol and drug counselor," "associate alcohol and drug counselor II," "associate alcohol and drug counselor
I,"[ "temporary alcohol and drug peer support specialist,"] or "registered alcohol and drug peer support
specialist," or hold himself or herself out as a "licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor," "licensed clinical
alcohol and drug counselor associate," "certified alcohol and drug counselor,"[ "temporary alcohol and drug
peer support specialist,"] or "registered alcohol and drug peer support specialist" unless he or she is licensed,
certified, or registered pursuant to KRS 309.080 to 309.089.
(2) Nothing in KRS 309.080 to 309.089 shall apply to persons licensed, certified, or registered under any other
provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, including but not limited to physicians, social workers,
psychologists, marriage and family therapists, art therapists, nurses, or students in accredited training programs
in those professions, and nothing in KRS 309.080 to 309.089 shall be construed to limit, interfere with, or
restrict the practice, descriptions of services, or manner in which they hold themselves out to the public.
(3) Nothing in KRS 309.080 to 309.089 shall be construed to alter, amend, or interfere with the practice of those
who render counseling services, including but not limited to employment counseling, job placement
counseling, vocational rehabilitation counseling, pastoral counseling based on any tenet of one's religious
beliefs, or school counseling.
(4) Nothing in KRS 309.080 to 309.089 shall apply to the activities and services of a student intern or trainee who
is pursuing a program of studies in alcohol and drug counseling at an accredited institution of higher
education, if these activities are performed under the supervision or direction of an approved supervisor and
the activities are part of the supervised program of studies.
Section 3. KRS 309.0813 is amended to read as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A for the administration and enforcement
of KRS 309.080 to 309.089;
(2) Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A establishing a code of ethics, standards of
practice, and continuing education for certified clinical supervisors, licensed alcohol and drug counselors,
licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselors, licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor associates, certified
alcohol and drug counselors, associate alcohol and drug counselors II, associate alcohol and drug counselors
I,[ temporary alcohol and drug peer support specialists,] and registered alcohol and drug peer support
specialists;
(3) Approve and disapprove, at least once every other month, those persons who shall be licensed, certified, or
registered under KRS 309.080 to 309.089;
(4) Approve the examination required of applicants for licensure or certification as certified clinical supervisors,
or as alcohol and drug counselors and applicants for registration as alcohol and drug peer support specialists,
and promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A for the administration and grading of
the examination;
(5) Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to define the process to register with the
board as a certified clinical supervisor, licensed alcohol and drug counselor, registered alcohol and drug peer
support specialist, certified alcohol and drug counselor, licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor associate,
or licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor;
(6) Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A establishing grounds and procedures for
denying, suspending, failing to reissue, or revoking a license, certificate, or registration, and issuing
reprimands and admonishments pursuant to KRS 309.080 to 309.089;
(7) Hold a hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B upon the request of an aggrieved licensee, licensee associate,
certificate holder, or registrant, or an applicant for a license, certificate, or registration;
(8) Employ needed personnel and establish their duties and compensation;
(9) Maintain a register of certified clinical supervisors, licensed alcohol and drug counselors, licensed clinical
alcohol and drug counselors, licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor associates, certified alcohol and drug
counselors, and registered alcohol and drug peer support specialists;
(10) Keep a complete record of the board's proceedings;

CHAPTER 80 3
(11) Investigate suspected or alleged violations of KRS 309.080 to 309.089 and the administrative regulations
promulgated pursuant to KRS 309.080 to 309.089;
(12) Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A establishing an initial licensure fee,
certification fee, registration fee, and annual renewal fees not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) each;
(13) Take legal action as necessary to restrain or enjoin violations of KRS 309.080 to 309.089 and the
administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS 309.080 to 309.089;
(14) Submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission by January 1 of each year,
which lists all hearings conducted by the board and the decisions rendered; and
(15) Collect and deposit all fees, fines, and other moneys owed to the board into the State Treasury to the credit of
the revolving fund established in KRS 309.082.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Kentucky Medicaid program, including the Department
for Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with which the department contracts for the delivery of
Medicaid services, shall not provide coverage for individual or group psychoeducational services.
Section 5. The following KRS section is repealed:
309.0836 Requirements for registration as a temporary alcohol and drug peer support specialist.
Section 6. (1) The Peer Support Professionals Work Group is hereby established as an independent
entity to develop statewide requirements for licensed peer support professionals and study the efficacy of establishing
a board of peer support professionals.
(2) The work group shall select a chair from among the members, meet as necessary, and submit to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services by November 1,
2026, agreed-upon recommendations on establishing a board of peer support professionals to develop statewide
requirements for licensed peer support professionals.
(3) The members of the work group shall not be paid or reimbursed for travel or other expenses. The work
group shall cease to exist after the recommendations are submitted in accordance with subsection (2) of this section,
unless the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services directs the work group's continuance.
(4) The work group shall consist of members appointed:
(a) By the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, Cabinet for
Health and Family Services, to include:
1. One peer support professional with experience in mental health recovery;
2. One peer support professional with experience in youth peer support recovery;
3. One peer support professional with experience in family or community peer support;
4. One peer support professional with experience in behavioral health peer support;
5. Two multidisciplinary educators or trainers from an approved peer support training program;
6. One recovery housing professional; and
7. One recovery community center professional;
(b) By the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, Cabinet for
Health and Family Services, from a list of names submitted by the Kentucky Board of Alcohol and Drug Counselors,
to include:
1. One registered peer support professional who specialized in substance use disorder recovery;
2. One employer of peer support professionals with experience in residential or clinical treatment;
3. One employer of peer support professionals with experience in recovery community centers;
4. One clinical supervisor who oversees peer support programs;
5. One behavioral health supervisor who oversees peer support programs; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
6. One member of the public who is a recipient of peer support services; and
(c) By the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, Cabinet for
Health and Family Services, from a list of names submitted by the Kentucky Division of Reentry Services,
Department of Corrections, Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, to include:
1. One certified peer support professional with experience in reentry from incarceration; and
2. One representative from the Kentucky Division of Reentry Services.
Section 7. Whereas there is an urgent need to protect the public health and safety by establishing consistent
standards and oversight for Kentucky's peer support workforce, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1, 2,
3, 5, and 6 of this Act take effect upon their passage and approval by the Governor or upon their otherwise becoming
a law.
Signed by Governor April 10, 2026.